Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 9.1. Registered Limited Liability Partnerships.

§ 50-73.132.
Registered limited liability partnerships.

To become a registered limited liability partnership, a partnership formed under the laws of the Commonwealth shall file with the Commission a statement of registration as a registered limited liability partnership stating:

The name of the partnership that satisfies the requirements of §

50-73.133

;

If the partnership is of record with the Commission, the identification number issued by the Commission to the partnership;

The address, including the street and number, if any, of its principal office (which may, but need not be, located within the Commonwealth);

The post office address, including the street and number, if any, of its initial registered office, which in the case of a limited partnership formed pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (§

50-73.1

et seq.) shall be identical to the limited partnership’s registered office address on record with the Commission;

The name of the city or county in which the registered office is located;

The name of its initial registered agent at that office, which in the case of a limited partnership formed pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (§

50-73.1

et seq.) shall be identical to the limited partnership’s registered agent on record with the Commission, and that the agent is either (i) an individual who is a resident of Virginia and is either a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, an officer or director of a corporate general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, a general partner of a partnership or limited partnership that is a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, a member or manager of a limited liability company that is a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, a trustee of a trust that is a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, or a member of the Virginia State Bar or (ii) a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth;

Any other matters that the partnership determines to include; and

The manner in which the registration was approved by the partners.A partnership becomes a registered limited liability partnership at the time of the filing of the initial statement of registration with the Commission or at any later date or time specified in the statement of registration as provided in subsection J of §

50-73.83

.

The Commission shall register as a registered limited liability partnership any partnership that submits a completed statement of registration with the required fee.

The registration of a partnership as a registered limited liability partnership shall be approved by the partners in the manner provided in the partnership’s partnership agreement for amendments to the partnership agreement or, if no provision is made in the partnership agreement, by all of the partners.

A partnership that has registered shall continue to be a registered limited liability partnership until its registration is canceled pursuant to subsection C of §

50-73.134

, subsection F of §

50-73.135

, §

50-73.137

, or

50-73.137:1

.

A partnership that has been registered as a registered limited liability partnership under this chapter is, for all purposes, the same entity that existed before it registered.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2000, c. 162; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2002, c. 441; 2003, c. 378; 2004, c. 601; 2007, c. 631; 2009, c. 716; 2013, c. 18.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 631, cl. 3 provides: “That upon the effective date of this act, the address of a partnership’s chief executive office on the records of the Commission shall be deemed the address of the partnership’s principal office, until the partnership changes such address on the records in the office of the clerk of the Commission pursuant to the provisions of the Virginia Uniform Partnership Act (§

50-73.79

et seq.).”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 162, in clause (ii) in the first sentence of subsection A, inserted “registered” proceeding “limited liability partnership registered,” and inserted “with the Virginia State Bar” thereafter.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “a limited liability company” for “the limited liability company,” inserted “a trustee of a trust that is a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership,” substituted “a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company” for “a professional corporation, professional limited liability company” and substituted “authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth” for “registered with the Virginia State Bar under §

54.1-3902

.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 441 substituted “subsection C” for “subsection D” in subdivision D 1.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 378 rewrote subsection A, dividing the subsection into two paragraphs and dividing the first of those paragraphs into subdivisions.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 601 deleted former subdivision A 8; redesignated former subdivision A 9 as present subdivision A 8 and made a minor stylistic change; in subdivision D 1 inserted “Its” preceding “registration” and deleted “statement” thereafter.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 inserted “formed under the laws of the Commonwealth” in subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 716, in subsection D, deleted the subdivisions 1 and 2 designations, substituted “canceled” for “revoked” and “subsection F of §

50-73.135

, § 50-13.137, or

50-73.137:1

” for “The partnership or limited partnership files with the Commission a statement of cancellation of registration under §

50-73.137

” and made related changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 inserted “partnership or limited partnership that is a” following “a general partner of a” in clause (i) of subdivision A 6 and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

§ 50-73.133.
Name of registered limited liability partnership.

The name of a partnership that is also a registered limited liability partnership shall contain the words “Registered Limited Liability Partnership” or “Limited Liability Partnership” or the abbreviation “R.L.L.P.” or “L.L.P.” or the designation “RLLP” or “LLP.”

The name of a limited partnership that is also a registered limited liability partnership shall comply with the requirements of subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

.

History.

1996, c. 292; 1998, c. 163; 2007, c. 631.

The 1998 amendments

added the subsection A designation; in subsection A, deleted “as the last words or letters of its name” following “LLP”; and added subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 inserted “a partnership that is also” in subsection A.

§ 50-73.134.
Registered limited liability partnership annual continuation reports; automatic cancellation of registration; restoration of status.

On or before July 1 of each year after the calendar year in which it became registered under §

50-73.132

, each registered limited liability partnership and each foreign registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth shall file an annual continuation report with the Commission setting forth the name of the partnership, the partnership’s current principal office address and, if a foreign registered limited liability partnership, the jurisdiction in which it is registered as a registered limited liability partnership. If the report appears to be incomplete or inaccurate, the Commission shall return it for correction or explanation. Otherwise, it shall be deemed filed in the office of the clerk of the Commission. The report shall be made on forms furnished by the Commission and shall be forwarded by the clerk of the Commission, before June 1, to each registered limited liability partnership.

The information required shall be given as of the date of the execution of the report, and it shall be executed by a partner in the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership or, if a receiver or trustee has been appointed for the partnership, by the receiver or trustee on behalf of the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership. The report shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed in subdivision F 2 of §

50-73.83

.

If any registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership fails to pay the fee or file any report required by this section on or before September 1 of the year due, the Commission shall mail notice to the partnership of the impending cancellation of its registration. Whether or not such notice is mailed, if the partnership fails to file the report or pay the fee on or before November 1 of the year it is due, the registration of the partnership shall be automatically canceled and the partnership shall automatically cease to be a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership as of November 1, but shall continue to be a partnership or limited partnership, as the case may be, under this title.

Any partnership formed under the laws of the Commonwealth that has ceased to be a registered limited liability partnership under subsection C shall not be considered to have dissolved as a result of ceasing to be a registered limited liability partnership.

A registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership that has ceased to be a registered limited liability partnership or a foreign registered limited liability partnership under subsection C, subsection F of §

50-73.135

, §

50-73.137

,

50-73.137

:1, or

50-73.139

, as the case may be, may apply to the Commission to have its status as a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership restored within five years of the date on which its status was canceled. To have its status restored, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership shall provide the Commission with the following:

An application for restoration signed by a partner of a partnership or a general partner of a limited partnership, as the case may be;

A restoration fee of $100;

An annual continuation report and payment of the fee due upon filing the annual continuation report for the year in which restoration is sought, unless the report previously was filed;

All fees that were due before its status as a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership was canceled and that would have become due thereafter for the filing of its annual continuation reports if its status had not been canceled;

Any amendment to its statement of registration with the Commission as required by subsection D of §

50-73.136

; and

If the registered limited liability partnership’s or foreign registered limited liability partnership’s registered agent has filed a certificate of resignation and a new registered agent has not been appointed, a certificate of change pursuant to §

50-73.135

.

The automatic cancellation of a foreign registered limited liability partnership’s registration constitutes the appointment of the clerk of the Commission as the foreign registered limited liability partnership’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign registered limited liability partnership was registered to transact business in the Commonwealth. Service of process on the clerk of the Commission under this subsection is service on the foreign registered limited liability partnership and shall be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Cancellation of a foreign registered limited liability partnership’s registration does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the foreign registered limited liability partnership.

A registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership that has ceased to be a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership under this section, subsection F of §

50-73.135

, §

50-73.137

,

50-73.137:1

, or

50-73.139

that restores its status as a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership shall be deemed not to have lost its status as a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership under this article.

The Commission shall not file with respect to any domestic or foreign registered limited liability partnership any statement referred to in this chapter until all annual continuation reports required to be filed with the Commission under this article have been filed.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2000, c. 5; 2002, c. 441; 2004, c. 601; 2007, c. 631; 2009, c. 716; 2013, c. 18.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 5, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the act that amend subsection A of this section shall apply retroactively to any partnership that obtains status as a registered limited liability partnership between January 1, 2000, and the effective date of the act [February 18, 2000].”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 5, effective February 18, 2000, in subsection A, inserted “after the calendar year in which it became registered under §

50-73.132

” in the first sentence and added the last three sentences; deleted subsection C, which dealt with conformance of a report to requirements and the applicability of subsection D; in subsection D, substituted “on or before September 1 of the year due, the Commission shall mail notice” for “the Commission shall give notice” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence substituted the language beginning “Whether or not” and rewrote the second sentence; substituted “restoration” for “reinstatement” in subdivision F 1; and in subdivision F 3, substituted “all fees that were due before cessation of registered status and that would have become due thereafter” for “the fee charged and collected,” “annual continuation” for “of” and “if cessation of status had not occurred” for “for each year a required report was not filed.” For applicability of this amendment, see the editor’s note.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 441 deleted former subsection C and redesignated former subsections D through G as present subsections C through F; substituted “subsection C” for “subsection D” in present subsections D and E; and added present subsection G.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 601 inserted “§

50-73.137

or §

50-73.139

” in subsection E; in subsection F, inserted “§

50-73.137

or §

50-73.139

” and substituted “five” for “two.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 inserted “on or” preceding “before November 1” in subsection C; substituted “Any partnership formed under the laws of the Commonwealth” for “Any registered limited liability partnership” in subsection D; in subsection E, inserted “as a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership within five years of the date on which its status” and substituted “such ceased by” for “such by taking some or all of the following steps, as applicable” at the end; rewrote subdivision E 2, and added subdivision E 4; in subsection F, deleted “within five years after the date on which its status as such has ceased” before “shall be deemed” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 716, in subsection C, substituted “fails to pay the fee or file” for “has failed to pay the fee or to file,” deleted “by first class mail” following “shall mail notice,” substituted “the impending cancellation” for “impending revocation” and substituted “canceled” for “revoked”; in subsection E, deleted “as the case may be” following “liability partnership,” substituted “subsection F of §

50-73.135

, §

50-73.137

,

50-73.137

:1, or

50-73.139

, as the case may be” for “§ 50-73.137, or §

50-73.139

,” “apply to the Commission to have” for “restore,” “was canceled” for “as such ceased by,” and added the last sentence; added subdivision E 1; redesignated former subdivisions E 1 through E 4 as subdivisions E 2 through E 5, respectively, and made related changes; in subdivision E 2, substituted “A restoration fee of $100” for “Paying a restoration fee prescribed in subdivision F 1 c of §

50-73.83

”; in subdivision E 3, substituted “An annual continuation report and payment of” for “Making and delivering an annual continuation paying,” and “restoration is sought” for “it is to be restored”; in subdivision E 4, substituted “All fees” for “Paying an amount equal to all fees,” “its status as a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership was canceled” for “cessation of registered status,” “if its status” for “for registered limited liability partnerships if cessation of status” and “been canceled” for “occurred”; in subdivision E 5, substituted “Any amendment” for “Filing any amendment”; added subdivision E 6; and in subsection F, substituted “subsection F of §

50-73.135

, § 50-73.137,

50-73.137:1

” for “§ 50-73.137” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 added subsections F and G and redesignated the following subsections accordingly.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 50-73.135.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each registered limited liability partnership and each foreign registered limited liability partnership registered pursuant to this article shall continuously maintain in this Commonwealth:

A registered office that may be the same as any of its places of business; and

A registered agent who shall be either:

An individual who is a resident of this Commonwealth and is either (i) a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, (ii) an officer or director of a corporate general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, (iii) a general partner of a partnership or limited partnership that is a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, (iv) a member or manager of a limited liability company that is a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, (v) a trustee of a trust that is a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, or (vi) a member of the Virginia State Bar, and whose business office is identical with the registered office; or

A domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth, the business office of which is identical with the registered office, provided that such a registered agent (i) shall not be its own registered agent and (ii) shall designate by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, one or more natural persons at the office of the registered agent upon whom any process, notice or demand may be served and shall continuously maintain at least one such person at that office. Whenever any such person accepts service, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.

The registered agent of a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership is the partnership’s agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the partnership. The sole duty of the registered agent is to forward to the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership at its last known address any process, notice, or demand that is served on the registered agent.

A registered limited liability partnership or a foreign registered limited liability partnership that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth may change its registered office or registered agent, or both, upon filing with the Commission a certificate of change on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission that sets forth:

The name of the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership;

The address of its current registered office;

If the current address of its registered office is to be changed, the post-office address, including the street and number, if any, of the new registered office, and the name of the city or county in which it is located;

The name of its current registered agent;

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership will be in compliance with the requirements of this section.

A certificate of change shall forthwith be filed with the Commission by a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership whenever its registered agent dies, resigns, or ceases to satisfy the requirements of subsection A.

A registered limited liability partnership’s or foreign registered limited liability partnership’s registered agent may sign a certificate as required above if (i) the business address of the registered agent changes to another post office address within the Commonwealth or (ii) the name of the registered agent has been legally changed. A registered limited liability partnership’s or foreign registered limited liability partnership’s new registered agent may sign and submit for filing a certificate as required above if (a) the former registered agent is a business entity that has been merged into the new registered agent, (b) the instrument of merger is on record in the office of the clerk of the Commission, and (c) the new registered agent is an entity that is qualified to serve as a registered agent pursuant to subsection A. In either instance, the registered agent or surviving entity shall forthwith file a certificate of change as required in subsection D, which shall recite that a copy of the certificate shall be mailed to the principal office of the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership on or before the business day following the day on which the certificate is filed.

A registered agent may resign as agent for the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership by signing and filing with the Commission a certificate of resignation stating (i) the name of the domestic or foreign registered limited liability partnership, (ii) the name of the agent, and (iii) that the agent resigns from serving as registered agent for the domestic or foreign registered limited liability partnership. The certificate of resignation shall be accompanied by a certification that the registered agent will have a copy of the certificate mailed to the principal office of the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the certificate is filed. When the certificate of resignation takes effect, the registered office is also discontinued. A certificate of resignation takes effect on the earlier of (a) 12:01 a.m. on the thirty-first day after the date on which the certificate was filed with the Commission or (b) the date on which a certificate of change in accordance with subsection C to appoint a registered agent is filed with the Commission. If any registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership whose registered agent has filed with the Commission a certificate of resignation fails to file a certificate of change pursuant to subsection C within 31 days after the date on which the certificate of resignation was filed, the Commission shall mail notice to the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership of the impending cancellation of its status as a registered limited liability partnership. If the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership fails to file a certificate of change on or before the last day of the second month immediately following the month in which the impending cancellation notice was mailed, the registered limited liability partnership’s or foreign registered limited liability partnership’s status as a registered limited liability partnership shall be automatically canceled as of that day.

Whenever a registered limited liability partnership or a foreign registered limited liability partnership fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this Commonwealth or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at his address, the clerk of the Commission shall be the agent of the partnership upon whom service may be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a registered limited liability partnership or a foreign registered limited liability partnership.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2000, c. 537; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2003, c. 597; 2009, c. 716; 2010, c. 434; 2013, c. 18; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 537, in subdivision A 2 a, inserted the designations for clauses (i) through (iv) and (vi), and added clause (v); and substituted “this section” for “§

50-73.135

” in subdivision C 6 and in subdivision D.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and in subdivision A 2 b, substituted “A domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth” for “A professional corporation or professional, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership registered under §

54.1-3902

” and inserted the language beginning “provided such a registered agent” and ending “a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 597 rewrote subsection E, which formerly read: “If a registered agent changes his business address to another place within this Commonwealth, he shall change his address for any registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership of which he is a registered agent by filing a certificate of change as required in subsection D, except that it need be signed, either manually or in facsimile, only by the registered agent and shall recite that a copy of the certificate has been mailed to the partnership at its principal office.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 716 added the last two sentences of subsection F.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 434, in subsection C, inserted “that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth,” substituted “office or registered agent” for “agent or the address of its registered office,” and “prescribed and furnished” for “supplied”; in subdivision C 1, inserted “registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability”; in subdivision C 3, deleted “address of its” following “of the new”; in subdivision C 6, inserted “registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability”; rewrote subsections D, E, and F.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 inserted “partnership or limited partnership that is a” following “a general partner of a” in clause (iii) of subdivision A 2 a.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection F, rewrote as the first four sentences the former first three sentences which read: “A registered agent may resign the agency appointment by signing and filing with the Commission a certificate of resignation accompanied by a certification that the registered agent shall mail a copy thereof to the principal office of the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the certificate is filed. The certificate of resignation may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued. The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the thirty-first day after the date on which the certificate was filed.”; and made stylistic changes. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

§ 50-73.136.
Amendment of statement of registration; effect of statement of registration.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection D or any other provision of this chapter, the status of a partnership as a registered limited liability partnership or a foreign registered limited liability partnership, and the liability of the partners thereof, shall not be affected by (i) errors in the information stated in the statement of registration, if the statement was filed in good faith, or (ii) changes after the filing of a statement of registration in the information stated in the statement.

A statement of registration or any amendment thereto may also serve as a statement of partnership authority under §

50-73.93

, a statement of denial under §

50-73.94

, a statement of dissociation under §

50-73.115

, or a statement of dissolution under §

50-73.121

if (i) the title of the statement indicates each purpose for which it is filed and (ii) if the statement of registration otherwise meets the requirements of the particular other statement and, to the extent that it serves as such an other statement, it may be amended, canceled or limited, in accordance with §§

50-73.93

,

50-73.94

,

50-73.115

and

50-73.121

, but any amendment, cancellation or limitation shall not affect the validity of the statement of registration of the partnership as a registered limited liability partnership, which may be amended only as provided in §

50-73.136

or canceled in accordance with §

50-73.137

or

50-73.139

.

The filing of a statement of registration shall be conclusive as to third parties, and it shall be incontestable by third parties that all conditions precedent to registration as a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership have been met.

A statement of registration for a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership is amended by filing an amendment thereto with the Commission. The amendment shall set forth: the name of the registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership, the date of filing of the initial statement of registration; in the case of a foreign registered limited liability partnership, the jurisdiction in which it is registered as a limited liability partnership; and the amendment to the statement of registration. An amendment to the statement of registration shall be filed by a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership not later than thirty days after (i) a change in the name of the partnership or (ii) the partnership has knowledge that a material statement in the statement of registration was false or inaccurate when made or that any facts described therein have changed, making the statement of registration inaccurate in any material respect. An amendment to the statement of registration may be filed for any other proper purpose. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or in the amendment to the statement of registration, an amendment to a statement of registration shall be effective at the time of its filing with the Commission.

Whenever a limited partnership that is registered as a registered limited liability partnership files a certificate of amendment to its certificate of limited partnership to change its name or the address of its principal office, or whenever a foreign limited partnership that is registered as a registered limited liability partnership files an amended application pursuant to subsection B of §

50-73.57

to amend its name or the address of its principal office in its application for registration as a foreign limited partnership, the domestic or foreign limited partnership’s statement of registration as a registered limited liability partnership shall be deemed likewise amended.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2000, c. 58; 2009, c. 716; 2013, c. 18.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 58, in subsection D, deleted former clause (ii), which read: “a change in the address of the principal office of the partnership,” and redesignated former clause (iii) as present clause (ii).

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 716 added “or

50-73.139

” to the end of subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 added subsection E.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 50-73.137.
Cancellation of a registered limited liability partnership.

A registered limited liability partnership registered under this chapter may cancel its registration by filing with the Commission a statement of cancellation of registration as a registered limited liability partnership, which shall set forth:

The name of the registered limited liability partnership;

The date of filing of the initial statement of registration;

The effective date (which shall be a date certain) of cancellation of registration if it is not to be effective on the filing of the statement of cancellation, but any effective date other than the date of filing of the statement of cancellation shall be a date subsequent to the filing; and

Any other information the partners determine to include therein.

The filing of a statement of cancellation of registration by or on behalf of a partnership pursuant to this section shall be effective only to cancel the partnership’s registration as a limited liability partnership, and shall not, unless it specifically so provides, indicate the dissolution of the partnership.

Cancellation of the registration of a partnership as a registered limited liability partnership shall require the consent of all of the partners in the partnership at the time the statement of cancellation of registration is filed.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.137:1.
Effect of cancellation of limited partnership certificate or registration.

Whenever the certificate of limited partnership of a domestic limited partnership that is registered as a registered limited liability partnership is canceled, the limited partnership’s registration as a registered limited liability partnership shall thereupon be automatically canceled unless the certificate of limited partnership was canceled pursuant to a conversion to a partnership under §

50-73.126

.

Whenever the certificate of registration to transact business in this Commonwealth of a foreign limited partnership that is registered as a foreign registered limited liability partnership is canceled, the foreign limited partnership’s registration as a foreign registered limited liability partnership shall thereupon be automatically canceled.

A registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership that has ceased to be a registered limited liability partnership or a foreign registered limited liability partnership under subsection A or B may restore its status as such by complying with the requirements of subsection E of §

50-73.134

.

History.

2003, c. 378; 2004, c. 601; 2009, c. 716.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 601 substituted “five years” for “two years” in subsection D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 716, in subsection A, substituted “canceled” for “revoked” and “certificate of limited partnership was canceled” for “cancellation was”; in subsection B, substituted “canceled” for “revoked”; and deleted subsection D, which read: “A registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership that has ceased to be a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership under this section that restores its status as a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership within five years after the date on which its status as such has ceased shall be deemed not to have lost its status as a registered limited liability partnership or foreign registered limited liability partnership under this section.”